Hawaii statutes.
§663J-3 Cause of action for coercion into
prostitution or sex trafficking. An individual has a cause of action
against a person who:

(1) Coerced the individual into prostitution or to
remain in prostitution, or subjected the individual to sex trafficking;

(2) Used coercion to collect or receive any of the
individual's earnings derived from prostitution or from being the subject of
sex trafficking; or

(3) Hired, or attempted to hire the individual to
engage in prostitution, when a reasonable person would believe that the
individual was coerced into prostitution by another person or was being
subjected to sex trafficking. [L 1999, c 203, pt of §2; am L 2016, c 206, §5]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next